Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2606
Existing junkyards; screening; expense paid by department.

Except as provided in section 39-2608, any junkyard lawfully in existence on August 27, 1971, which is within one thousand feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way and visible from the main-traveled way of the Highway Beautification Control System and which does not qualify for a permit under section 39-2605 shall be screened by the department so as not to be visible from the main-traveled way of such highway, the cost of which shall be paid in full by the department.

Laws 1971, LB 398, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 29.